North Carolina statutes. Chapter 48. Adoptions.
Article 2. General Adoption Procedure.
§ 48-2-502.
Preparation and content of report.

In preparing a report to the court, the agency shall conduct a personal interview with each petitioner in the petitioner’s residence and at least one additional interview with each petitioner and the adoptee, and shall observe the relationship between the adoptee and the petitioner or petitioners.

The report must be in writing and contain:

An account of the petitioner’s marital or family status, physical and mental health, home environment, property, income, and financial obligations; if there has been a preplacement assessment, the account may be limited to any changes since the filing of the preplacement assessment;

All reasonably available nonidentifying information concerning the physical, mental, and emotional condition of the adoptee required by

G.S. 48-3-205

which is not already included in the document prepared under that section;

Copies of any court order, judgment, decree, or pending legal proceeding affecting the adoptee, the petitioner, or any child of the petitioner relevant to the welfare of the adoptee;

A list of the expenses, fees, or other charges incurred, paid, or to be paid in connection with the adoption that can reasonably be ascertained by the agency;

Any fact or circumstance known to the agency that raises a specific concern about whether the proposed adoption is contrary to the best interest of the adoptee because it poses a significant risk of harm to the well-being of the adoptee;

A finding by the agency concerning the suitability of the petitioner and the petitioner’s home for the adoptee;

A recommendation concerning the granting of the petition; and

Such other information as may be required by rules adopted pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

In an agency adoption, the report shall be written in such a way as to exclude all information that could reasonably be expected to lead directly to the identity of the adoptee at birth or any former parent or family member of the adoptee, and any copies of documents included pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection shall be redacted to exclude this information.

The Social Services Commission may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1983, c. 454, s. 5; 1991, c. 335, s. 2; 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1997-215, s. 4.

§ 48-2-503.
Timing and filing of report.

The agency shall complete a written report and file it with the court within 60 days after the mailing or delivery of the order under

G.S. 48-2-501

unless the court extends the time for filing. The agency shall have three additional days to complete and file the report if the order was mailed.

If the agency identifies a specific concern about the suitability of the petitioner or the petitioner’s home for the adoptee, the agency must file an interim report immediately, which must contain an account of the specific concern. The agency shall indicate in the final report whether its concerns have been satisfied and in what manner.

(b1)

When an agency identifies a specific concern in a final report and the court extends the time for a final hearing or disposition to allow resolution of these concerns, the agency shall file a supplemental report indicating whether its concerns have been satisfied and in what manner.

The agency shall give the petitioner a copy of each report filed with the court, and the agency shall retain a copy.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1983, c. 454, s. 5; 1991, c. 335, s. 2; 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1997-215, s. 5(a)-(c).

Legal Periodicals.

For 1997 legislative survey, see 20 Campbell L. Rev. 459 (1998).

§ 48-2-504.
Fee for report.

An agency that prepares a report to the court may charge the petitioner a reasonable fee for preparing and writing the report. No fee may be charged except pursuant to a written fee agreement which must be signed by the parties to be charged prior to the beginning of the preparation. The fee agreement may not be based on the outcome of the report or the adoption proceeding.

A fee for a report is subject to review by the court pursuant to

G.S. 48-2-602

and

G.S. 48-2-603

.

The Department shall set the maximum fees, based on ability to pay and other factors, which may be charged by county departments of social services. The Department shall require waiver of fees for those unable to pay. Fees collected under this section shall be applied to the costs of preparing and writing reports and shall be used by the county department of social services to supplement and not to supplant appropriated funds.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2.

Part 6. Dispositional Hearing; Decree of Adoption.

§ 48-2-601.
Hearing on, or disposition of, adoption petition; transfer of adoption proceeding; timing.

If it appears to the court that a petition to adopt a minor is not contested, the court may dispose of the petition without a formal hearing.

(a1)

If an issue of fact, an equitable defense, or a request for equitable relief is raised before the clerk, the clerk shall transfer the proceeding to the district court under

G.S. 1-301.2

.

No later than 90 days after a petition for adoption has been filed, the court shall set a date and time for hearing or disposing of the petition.

The hearing or disposition must take place no later than six months after the petition is filed, but the court for cause may extend the time for the hearing or disposition.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1953, c. 571; 1959, cc. 340, 561; 1961, cc. 186, 384; 1967, c. 19; c. 619, s. 4; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 1354, s. 6; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 977, s. 1; 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1997-215, s. 10(a); 2002-159, s. 12.

§ 48-2-602.
Disclosure of fees and charges.

At least 10 days before the date of the hearing or disposition, each petitioner shall file with the court an affidavit accounting for any payment or disbursement of money or anything of value made or agreed to be made by or on behalf of each petitioner in connection with the adoption, or pursuant to Article 10, including the amount of each payment or disbursement made or to be made and the name and address of each recipient. The court in its discretion may request a more specific statement of any fees, charges, or payments made or to be made by any petitioner in connection with the adoption.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2.

§ 48-2-603.
Hearing on, or disposition of, petition to adopt a minor.

At the hearing on, or disposition of, a petition to adopt a minor, the court shall grant the petition upon finding by a preponderance of the evidence that the adoption will serve the best interest of the adoptee, and upon finding the following:

At least 90 days have elapsed since the filing of the petition for adoption, unless the court for cause waives this requirement.

The adoptee has been in the physical custody of the petitioner for at least 90 days, unless the court for cause waives this requirement.

Notice of the filing of the petition has been served on any person entitled to receive notice under Part 4 of this Article.

Each necessary consent, relinquishment, waiver, or judicial order terminating parental rights, has been obtained and filed with the court and the time for revocation has expired.

Any assessment required by this Chapter has been filed with and considered by the court.

If applicable, the requirements of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, Article 38 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes, have been met.

Any motion to dismiss the proceeding has been denied.

Each petitioner is a suitable adoptive parent.

Any accounting and affidavit required under

G.S. 48-2-602

has been reviewed by the court, and the court has denied, modified, or ordered reimbursement of any payment or disbursement that violates Article 10 or is unreasonable when compared with the expenses customarily incurred in connection with an adoption.

The petitioner has received information about the adoptee and the adoptee’s biological family if required by

G.S. 48-3-205

.

(10a)

Any certificate of service required by

G.S. 48-3-307

has been filed.

There has been substantial compliance with the provisions of this Chapter.

If the Court finds a violation of this Chapter pursuant to Article 10 or of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, Article 38 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes, but determines that in every other respect there has been substantial compliance with the provisions of this Chapter, and the adoption will serve the best interest of the adoptee, the court shall:

Grant the petition to adopt; and

Impose the sanctions provided by this Chapter against any individual or entity who has committed a prohibited act or report the violations to the appropriate legal authorities.

The court on its own motion may continue the hearing for further evidence.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1953, c. 571; 1959, cc. 340, 561; 1961, cc. 186, 384; 1967, c. 19; c. 619, s. 4; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; c. 1354, s. 6; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 977, s. 1; 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1998-202, s. 13(l); 2001-150, s. 5.

Legal Periodicals.

For 1997 legislative survey, see 20 Campbell L. Rev. 459 (1998).

§ 48-2-604.
Denying petition to adopt a minor.

If at any time between the filing of a petition to adopt a minor and the issuance of the final order completing the adoption it appears to the court that the minor should not be adopted by the petitioners or the petition should be dismissed for some other reason, the court may dismiss the proceeding.

The court, before entering an order to dismiss the proceeding, shall give at least five days’ notice of the motion to dismiss to the parties, to the agency that made the report to the court, and to the Department of Health and Human Services. The parties and agency entitled to notice under this subsection, and the Department, shall be entitled to a hearing on the issue of dismissing the proceeding.

If the court denies the petition, the custody of the minor shall revert to any agency or person having custody immediately before the filing of the petition. If the placement of the minor was a direct placement under Article 3 of this Chapter, the court shall notify the director of social services of the county in which the petition was filed of the dismissal, and the director of social services shall be responsible for taking appropriate action for the protection of the minor.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1983, c. 454, s. 6; 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1997-215, s. 6(a); 1997-443, s. 11A.118(b).

Legal Periodicals.

For 1997 legislative survey, see 20 Campbell L. Rev. 459 (1998).

§ 48-2-605.
Hearing on petition to adopt an adult.

At the hearing on a petition to adopt an adult, the prospective adoptive parent and the adoptee shall both appear in person, unless the court waives this requirement for cause, in which event an appearance may be made for either or both of them by an attorney authorized in writing to make the appearance.

At the hearing, the court shall grant the petition for adoption upon finding by a preponderance of the evidence all of the following:

At least 30 days have elapsed since the filing of the petition for adoption, but the court for cause may waive this requirement;

Notice of the petition has been served on any person entitled to receive notice under Part 4 of this Article;

Each necessary consent, waiver, document, or judicial order has been obtained and filed with the court;

The adoption is entered into freely and without duress or undue influence for the purpose of creating the relation of parent and child between each petitioner and the adoptee, and each petitioner and the adoptee understand the consequences of the adoption; and

There has been substantial compliance with the provisions of this Chapter.

History.

1967, c. 880, s. 3; 1969, c. 21, ss. 3-6; 1971, c. 1231, s. 1; 1973, c. 849, s. 3; 1975, c. 91; 1981, c. 657; 1989, c. 208; c. 727, s. 219(4); 1993, c. 553, s. 14; 1995, c. 457, s. 2.

§ 48-2-606.
Decree of adoption.

A decree of adoption must state at least:

The name and gender of each petitioner for adoption;

Whether the petitioner is married, a stepparent, or single;

The name by which the adoptee is to be known;

Information to be incorporated in a new standard certificate of birth to be issued by the State Registrar;

The adoptee’s date and place of birth, if known, or as determined under subsection (b) of this section in the case of an adoptee born outside the United States;

The effect of the decree of adoption as set forth in

G.S. 48-1-106

; and

That the adoption is in the best interest of the adoptee.

In stating the date and place of birth of an adoptee born outside the United States, the court shall do each of the following:

Enter the date of birth as stated in the certificate of birth from the country of origin, the United States Department of State’s report of birth abroad, or the documents of the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service or a date of birth based upon medical evidence by affidavit or testimony as to the probable chronological age of the adoptee and other evidence the court finds appropriate to consider.

Enter the place of birth as stated in the certificate of birth from the country of origin, the United States Department of State’s report of birth abroad, or the documents of the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service or, if the exact place of birth is unknown, enter the information that is known, including the country of origin.

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-172, s. 5, effective October 1, 2019.

A decree of adoption must not contain the name of a former parent of the adoptee.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1983, c. 454, s. 6; 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 2019-172, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-172, s. 5, effective October 1, 2019, in subsection (b), added “do each of the following” in the introductory paragraph; transferred language similar to former subdivision (3) to the end of subdivision (1); and added “Enter the place of birth as stated in the certificate of birth from the country of origin, the United States Department of State’s report of birth abroad, or the documents of the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service or” in subdivision (2).

§ 48-2-607.
Appeals.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, after the final order of adoption is entered, no party to an adoption proceeding nor anyone claiming under such a party may question the validity of the adoption because of any defect or irregularity, jurisdictional or otherwise, in the proceeding, but shall be fully bound by the order. No adoption may be attacked either directly or collaterally because of any procedural or other defect by anyone who was not a party to the adoption. The failure on the part of the court or an agency to perform duties or acts within the time required by the provisions of this Chapter shall not affect the validity of any adoption proceeding.

A party to an adoption proceeding may appeal a final decree of adoption entered by a clerk of superior court to district court by giving notice of appeal as provided in

G.S. 1-301.2

. A party to an adoption proceeding may appeal a judgment or order entered by a judge of district court by giving notice of appeal as provided in

G.S. 1-279.1

.

A parent or guardian whose consent or relinquishment was obtained by fraud or duress may, within six months of the time the fraud or duress is or ought reasonably to have been discovered, move to have the decree of adoption set aside and the consent declared void. A parent or guardian whose consent was necessary under this Chapter but was not obtained may, within six months of the time the omission is or ought reasonably to have been discovered, move to have the decree of adoption set aside. Any action for damages against an adoptee or the adoptive parents for fraud or duress in obtaining a consent must be brought within six months of the time the fraud or duress is or ought reasonably to have been discovered.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 982; 1983, c. 454, s. 6; 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1999-216, s. 11.1.